Delaware, session 153, SB111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Section 12, Chapter 141, Volume 68, Laws of Delaware, as amended, by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: 12. Remedies. Power and Methods Charges Due to the Town. 12.4 Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, in the collection of taxes and other charges owed to the Town of Odessa, the Treasurer shall have all the powers conferred upon or vested in the Department of Finance for New Castle County, including those set forth in Chapter 87, Title 9 of the Delaware Code, particularly subchapter II related to the monition method of sale.